Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.350

Identification of core services for budget purposes—Specific services listed.

The basic core services and cost upon which educational service districts are budgeted shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Educational service district administration and facilities such as office space, maintenance and utilities;

(2) Cooperative administrative services such as assistance in carrying out procedures to abolish sex and race bias in school programs, fiscal services, grants management services, special education services and transportation services;

(3) Personnel services such as certification/registration services;

(4) Learning resource services such as audiovisual aids;

(5) Cooperative curriculum services such as health promotion and health education services, in-service training, workshops and assessment;

(6) Professional development services identified by statute or the omnibus appropriations act; and

(7) Special needs of local education agencies.

[ 2007 c 402 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.21.137.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2007 c 402: See note following RCW 28A.415.340.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.